District of Columbia statutes.
47-2503

Private banks.

Private banks or bankers not incorporated shall pay a tax of $500 per annum. Every person, firm, company, or association not incorporated having a place of business where credits are opened by the deposit or collection of moneys or currency subject to be paid or remitted upon draft, check, or order, or where money is advanced or loaned on stocks, bonds, bullion, bills of exchange, or promissory notes, or where stocks, bonds, bills of exchange, or promissory notes are received for discount or for sale, shall be regarded as a private bank or banker.

July 1, 1902, 32 Stat. 621, ch. 1352, § 6, par. 14
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575

History

1981 Ed., § 47-2503.
1973 Ed., § 47-1706.

Prior Codifications